South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S345.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 50-11-510 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 50-11-510. (A) It is unlawful for a person to: (1) hunt or take or attempt to hunt or take a wild turkey by means of, or aid or use of, bait or baiting; or (2) hunt or take or attempt to hunt or take a wild turkey on or over any baited area. (B) As used in this section,: (1) "bait" or "baiting'" means the placing, "depositing, exposing, distributing, or scattering of salt, shelled, shucked, or unshucked corn, wheat, or other grain, or other foodstuffs to that constitute a lure, attraction, or enticement for wild turkeys a lure, attraction, or enticement to, on, or over any areasan area where hunters are attempting to take them,; and (2) "baited area" means an area where salt, shelled, shucked, or unshucked corn, wheat, or other grain, or other foodstuffs capable of luring, attracting, or enticing wild turkeys is directly or indirectly placed, exposed, deposited, distributed, or scattered, and. the The area remains a baited area for ten days following complete consumption or removal of all bait. (C) It is not a violation of this section if a person hunts or takes or attempts to hunt or take a wild turkey over a baited area for wild bobwhite quail, and is located on a property that is permitted by the department for the restoration and sustainability of wild bobwhite quail. The property must not be leased for turkey hunting, and there must be no commercial hunts for wild turkey on the property. A permit issued by the department for the restoration and sustainability of wild bobwhite quail: (1) must contain conditions in conformance with best practices for managing wild bobwhite quail habitat; and (2) is contingent on the receipt and approval of a wild bobwhite quail management plan that must be updated no less than every five years. (D) The department may revoke a permit issued under subsection (C) if a permit condition is violated. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----